de: Bauplattenmaterial: Zement; Gips; Hartfaserplatte; Mitteldichte Faserplatte (MDF); Spanplatte; Sperrholz; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Vinyl; Holz; Sonstiges
fi: Rakennuslevymateriaali: Sementti; Kipsi; Kovalevy; Puolikova kuitulevy (MDF); Lastulevy; Vaneri; Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Vinyyli; Puu; Muu
pt-PT: Material da placa de construção: Cimento; Gesso; Madeira compensada; Painel de fibra de média densidade (MDF); Aglomerado de madeira; Contraplacado; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Vinil; Madeira; Outro
sv: Byggskiva - material: Cement; Gips; Hardboard; Mediumdensitetsfiberskiva (MDF); Spånskiva; Plywood; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Vinyl; Trä; Övrigt
el: Υλικό οικοδομικών σανίδων: Τσιμέντο; Γύψος; Χαρτοσανίδα; Ινοσανίδα μεσαίας πυκνότητας (MDF); Μοριοσανίδα; Κόντρα πλακέ; Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Βινύλιο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
ru: Материал строительной плиты: Цемент; Гипс; ДВП; Древесноволокнистая плита средней плотности (МДФ); ДСП; Фанера; Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Винил; Дерево; Другое
tr: Yapı tahtası malzemesi: Çimento; Alçı; Sunta; Orta yoğunluklu lif levha (MDF); İnce elyaflı sunta; Kontrplak; Polivinil klorür (PVC); Vinil; Ahşap; Diğer
it: Materiale del pannello da costruzione: Cemento; Gesso; Pannello rigido; Pannello di fibra a media densità (MDF); Pannello truciolare; Compensato; Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Vinile; Legno; Altro
da: Byggeplademateriale: Cement; Gips; Hardboard; Medium density-fiberplade (MDF); Spånplade; Krydsfiner; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Vinyl; Træ; Andet
th: วัสดุใช้ทำบอร์ดตัวต่อ: ซีเมนต์; ยิปซัม; ฮาร์ดบอร์ด; ไฟเบอร์บอร์ดความหนาแน่นปานกลาง (MDF); แผ่นไม้พาร์ติเคิล; แผ่นไม้อัด; โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ไวนิล; ไม้; อื่นๆ
nl: Materiaal bouwplaat: Cement; Gypsum; Hardboard; Medium density vezelplaat (MDF); Spaanplaat; Multiplex; Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Vinyl; Hout; Andere
zh-TW: 建築板材材料: 水泥; 石膏; 硬質纖維板; 中密度纖維板; 刨花板; 合板; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 乙烯基; 木材; 其他
ko: 건축판재 소재: 시멘트; 석고; 하드보드; 중밀도 섬유 보드(HDF); 파티클 보드; 합판; 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 비닐; 목재; 기타
pt-BR: Material de placa de construção: Cimento; Gesso; Cartão duro; Painel de fibra de média densidade (MDF); Painel de partículas; Madeira compensada; Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Vinil; Madeira; Outro
zh-CN: 建筑板材: 水泥; 石膏; 硬板; 中密度纤维板 (MDF); 颗粒板; 胶合板; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 乙烯基贴纸; 木头; 其他
ja: 建築用ボードの材質: セメント; 石膏; ハードボード; 中密度繊維板 (MDF); パーティクルボード; 合板; ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ビニール; 木材; その他
lt-LT: Statybinės plokštės medžiaga: Cementas; Gipsas; Medienos plaušų plokštė; Vidutinio tankio medienos plaušų plokštė (MDF); Medienos drožlių plokštė; Fanera; Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Vinilas; Mediena; Kita
sk-SK: Materiál stavebnej dosky: Cement; Sadra; Lisovaná doska; Drevovláknitá doska strednej hustoty (MDF); Drevotrieska; Preglejka; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Vinyl; Drevo; Iné
bg-BG: Материал за строителни плоскости: Цимент; Гипс; Твърд картон; Фазер със средна плътност (MDF); Плочи от дървесни частици; Шперплат; Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Винил; Дърво; Други
fr: Matériau du panneau de construction: Ciment; Gypsum; Panneaux durs; Panneaux de fibres de densité moyenne (MDF); Panneaux de particules; Contre-plaqué; Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Vinyl; Bois; Autre
hu: Építőlemez anyaga: Cement; Gipsz; Farostlemez; Közepes sűrűségű farostlemez (MDF); Forgácslap; Furnér; Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Vinil; Fa; Egyéb
ro-RO: Material placă construcții: Ciment; Gips; Placă dură; Plăci din fibre cu densitate medie (MDF); Placă aglomerată; Placaj; Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Vinyl; Lemn; Altele
en: Building board material: Cement; Gypsum; Hardboard; Medium density fiberboard (MDF); Particle board; Plywood; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Vinyl; Wood; Other
cs: Materiál stavěcí desky: Cement; Omítka; Sololit; Dřevovláknitá deska se střední hustotou (HDF); Dřevotřísková deska; Překližka; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Vinylové; Dřevo; Jiné
nb: Byggeplatemateriale: Sement; Gips; Hardboard; Fiberplater med middels tetthet (MDF); Sponplate; Kryssfiner; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Vinyl; Trevirke; Annet
sl-SI: Material gradbene plošče: Cement; Gips; Lesonitna plošča; Vlaknene plošče srednje gostote (MDF); Iverne plošče; Vezane plošče; Polivinilklorid (PVC); Vinil; Les; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal građevinske ploče: Cement; Gips; Iverica; Vlaknasta ploča srednje gustoće (MDF); Iverica; Šperploča; Polivinil klorid (PVC); Vinil; Drvo; Ostalo
vi: Vật liệu các tông xây dựng: Xi măng; Thạch cao; Tấm ép cứng; Ván sợi mật độ trung bình (MDF); Ván dăm; Gỗ ép; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Nhựa vinyl; Gỗ; Khác
pl: Materiał płyty budowlanej: Cement; Gips; Twarda płyta pilśniowa; Płyta pilśniowa średniej gęstości (MDF); Płyta wiórowa; Sklejka; Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Winyl; Drewno; Inne
es: Material del tablero de construcción: Cemento; Yeso; Tablero duro; Tablero de fibra de densidad media (MDF); Tablero de partículas; Madera contrachapada; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Vinilo; Madera; Otros